Illinois, session 104th, HB1874.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The Property Tax Code is amended by adding 5Section 15-87 as follows: 6    (35 ILCS 200/15-87 new)7    Sec. 15-87. Community-integrated living arrangements.8    (a) Beginning in taxable year 2026, property that is used 9exclusively for the operation of a community-integrated living 10arrangement is entitled to a reduction in the equalized 11assessed value of the property as provided in subsection (b). 12If the community-integrated living arrangement is not operated 13by a not-for-profit organization, then the reduction under 14this Section applies only if all of the following conditions 15are met: 16        (1) the property must be owned by a resident of the 17    community-integrated living arrangement, by a family 18    member of a resident of the community-integrated living 19    arrangement, or by a limited liability company that has a 20    member who is a resident of the community-integrated 21    living arrangement or a family member of a resident of the 22    community-integrated living arrangement; 23        (2) the community-integrated living arrangement must   HB1874- 2 -LRB104 09259 HLH 19317 b1    be the principal place of residence of at least one other 2    person who is not a family member of an owner or member 3    described in item (1); 4        (3) the community-integrated living arrangement must 5    be licensed under the Community-Integrated Living 6    Arrangements Licensure and Certification Act; and 7        (4) the owner of the property may not be the owner of 8    any other community-integrated living arrangement. 9    (b) The amount of the reduction shall be the product that 10results when the number of occupants who use the 11community-integrated living arrangement as a primary 12residence, as determined for the month of the taxable year 13when the community-integrated living arrangement has the 14largest number of occupants, is multiplied by $2,000. In no 15event may a reduction under this Section reduce the equalized 16assessed value of the property to less than zero. 17    (c) Application for the reduction under this Section must 18be made during the application period in effect for the county 19in which the property is located. The assessor or chief county 20assessment officer may determine the eligibility of 21residential property to receive the reduction by application, 22visual inspection, questionnaire, or other reasonable methods. 23    (d) As used in this Section:24    "Community-integrated living arrangement" has the meaning 25given to that term in Section 3 of the Community-Integrated 26Living Arrangements Licensure and Certification Act.   HB1874- 3 -LRB104 09259 HLH 19317 b1    "Family member" means a spouse, civil union partner, 2child, stepchild, grandchild, sibling, aunt, uncle, niece, 3nephew, first cousin, parent, stepparent, or grandparent of a 4person who is a resident of the community-integrated living 5arrangement.  6    Section 99. Effective date. This Act takes effect upon 7becoming law.